Utah statutes.
53A-17a-120.5.   Appropriation for concurrent enrollment.

(1)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education for concurrent enrollment shall be allocated as follows:

(a)  the money shall first be allocated proportionally, based upon student credit hour delivered, between courses that are:

(i)  taught by public school educators; and

(ii)  taught by college or university faculty;

(b)  from the money allocated under Subsection (1)(a)(i):

(i)  60% of the money shall be allocated to local school boards and charter schools; and

(ii)  40% of the money shall be allocated to the State Board of Regents; and

(c)  from the money allocated under Subsection (1)(a)(ii):

(i)  40% of the money shall be allocated to local school boards and charter schools; and

(ii)  60% of the money shall be allocated to the State Board of Regents.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall make rules providing that a school participating in the concurrent enrollment programs offered under Section 53A-15-101 shall receive an allocation from the money described in Subsection (1) as provided in Section 53A-15-101.

(3)  The State Board of Regents shall make rules providing that an institution of higher education participating in the concurrent enrollment programs offered under Section 53A-15-101 shall receive an allocation from the money described in Subsection (1) as provided in the rules.

(4)  Subject to budget constraints, the Legislature shall annually increase the money appropriated to the State Board of Education for concurrent enrollment based on:

(a)  enrollment growth in concurrent enrollment from additional students enrolled, courses offered, and credit hours taken; and

(b)  the percentage increase in the value of the weighted pupil unit.

(5) (a)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Regents shall annually report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee:

(i)  an accounting of the money appropriated for concurrent enrollment; and

(ii)  a justification of the split described in Subsections (1)(a) and (b).

(b)  The State Board of Regents shall annually report to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee on concurrent enrollment participation and growth, including data on what higher education tuition would have been charged for the hours of concurrent enrollment credit granted.

(6)  In order to qualify for funds under this section, a concurrent enrollment program shall comply with the requirements described in Section 53A-15-101, including rules adopted in accordance with Subsection 53A-15-101(3).

